Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.230

Consultant's license—Requirements.

The director shall require each applicant for a pest control consultant's license or a public pest control consultant's license to demonstrate to the director the applicant's knowledge of pesticide laws and regulations; pesticide hazards; and the safe distribution, use and application, and disposal of pesticides by satisfactorily passing a written examination for the classifications for which the applicant has applied prior to issuing the license.

[ 1989 c 380 s 18; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 23.]